Utah statutes.
63G-7-501.   Jurisdiction of district courts over actions.

(1)  The district courts have exclusive, original jurisdiction over any action brought under this chapter.

(2)  An action brought under this chapter may not be tried as a small claims action.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

